Utah statutes.
4-39-301.   Genetic purity requirements -- Proof of source.
As part of any inspection for licensing or renewing the license of a
domesticated elk facility, or for the importation, transportation, or change
of ownership of any domesticated elk, the department shall require:
(1)  proof of genetic testing to ensure the purity of the domesticated elk
herds and prevent the introduction of red deer or hybrid nonnative species
into domesticated elk herds in Utah by showing evidence of the purity of live
animals, gametes, eggs, sperm, or other genetic material; and
(2)  proof that the domesticated elk originates from a legal source as
provided in Section 4-39-302.
